North Dakota, session 69, SB2038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 17 of section 57-01-02 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
17. Upon receipt of a written request from the chairman of the legislative management or the
chairman of a standing committee of the legislative assembly, the tax commissioner shall
disclose the amount of any tax deduction or creditincentive that was claimed or earned by a
taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection, a "tax incentive" includes a tax deduction, credit, or
exemption. This subsection does not authorize disclosure of the taxpayer's name or any other
information prohibited from disclosure under title 57. The tax commissioner shall provide
notice to taxpayers of possible disclosure under this subsection, in a manner as prescribed by
the tax commissioner.
SECTION 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. This Act applies retroactively to tax incentives
claimed or granted after December 31, 2024.

S. B. NO. 2038 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2038.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State